Hawaii statutes.
§349-2 Executive office on aging;
appointments. (a) There is established within the department of health,
for administrative purposes only, an executive office on aging.

(b) The head of this office shall be known as
the director of the executive office on aging, hereinafter referred to as
director. The director shall have professional training in the field of social
work, education, public health, and other related fields; extensive direct
experience in programs or services related to elders; and recent experience in
a supervisory, consultative, or administrative position. The director shall be
nominated and appointed by the governor without regard to chapters 76 and 89.
Effective July 1, 2005, the director shall be paid a salary set by the appointing
authority that shall not exceed sixty-nine per cent of the salary of the
director of human resources development. The director shall be included in any
benefit program generally applicable to the officers and employees of the
State. [L 1976, c 217, pt of §2; am L 1982, c 129, §12; am L 1986, c 128, §11;
am L 1989, c 329, §9; am L 1990, c 67, §8; am L 2002, c 148, §39; am L 2003, c
204, §1; am L 2005, c 226, §9]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next